test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-munoTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - муʼ: # Noun ' /(fin) ' - partial paradigm /Type  n+o/
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom: муʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc: мунмʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen: мунʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat: мундʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc: [муӈгана, муӈгна]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl: муӈгад
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros: мумна
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom: муӈгʼ
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc: муӈгʼ
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen: муӈгʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom: мунˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc: муно
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen: муноˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat: муӈгˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc: [муӈгаˮна, муӈгˮна]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl: муӈгат
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros: муноˮмана
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [мум, муми]
#     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: муми
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [мум, муми]
#     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: муми
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [мун, муни]
#     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: муни
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [муӈган, муӈгани, муӈгни]
#     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: [муӈгани, муӈгни]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [муӈганан, муӈгнан, муӈганани, муӈгнани]
#     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: [муӈганани, муӈгнани]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [муӈгадан, муӈгдан, муӈгадани, муӈгдани]
#     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [муӈгадани, муӈгдани]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [мумнан, мумнани]
#     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: мумнани
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [муӈгаюн, муӈгюн, муӈгаюни, муӈгюни]
#     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: [муӈгаюни, муӈгюни]
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [муӈгаюн, муӈгюн, муӈгаюни, муӈгюни]
#     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: [муӈгаюни, муӈгюни]
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [муӈгаюн, муӈгюн, муӈгаюни, муӈгюни]
#     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: [муӈгаюни, муӈгюни]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [мунон, мунони]
#     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: мунони
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [мунон, мунони]
#     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: мунони
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [муноˮн, муноˮни]
#     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: муноˮни
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [муӈгаˮн, муӈгаˮни, муӈгˮни]
#     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: [муӈгаˮни, муӈгˮни]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [муӈгаˮнан, муӈгˮнан, муӈгаˮнани, муӈгˮнани]
#     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: [муӈгаˮнани, муӈгˮнани]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [муӈгатан, муӈгтан, муӈгатани, муӈгтани]
#     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [муӈгатани, муӈгтани]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [муноˮманан, муноˮманани]
#     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: муноˮманани
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: мул
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: мунд
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: мунд
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: муӈганд
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [муӈгананд, муӈгнанд]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [муӈгаданд, муӈгданд]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: мумнанд
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [муӈгаюд, муӈгюд]
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [муӈгаюд, муӈгюд]
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [муӈгают, муӈгют]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: мунод
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: мунод
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: мунот
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: муӈгат
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [муӈгаˮнат, муӈгˮнат]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [муӈгатат, муӈгтат]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: муноˮманат
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: мунда
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: мунда
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: мунда
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: муӈганда
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [муӈгананда, муӈгнанда]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [муӈгаданда, муӈгданда]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: мумнанда
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [муӈгаюда, муӈгюда]
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [муӈгаюда, муӈгюда]
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [муӈгаюта, муӈгюта]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: мунода
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: мунода
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: мунота
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [муӈгата, муӈгта]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [муӈгаˮната, муӈгˮната]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [муӈгатата, муӈгтата]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: муноˮманата
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: мумиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: мумиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: муниʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: [муӈганиʼ, муӈгниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [муӈгананиʼ, муӈгнаниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [муӈгаданиʼ, муӈгданиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: мумнаниʼ
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [муӈгаюниʼ, муӈгюниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [муӈгаюниʼ, муӈгюниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [муӈгаюниʼ, муӈгюниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: мунониʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: мунониʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: муноˮниʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: [муӈгаˮниʼ, муӈгˮниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [муӈгаˮнаниʼ, муӈгˮнаниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [муӈгатаниʼ, муӈгтаниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: муноˮмананиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: мулиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: мундиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: мундиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: муӈгандиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [муӈганандиʼ, муӈгнандиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [муӈгадандиʼ, муӈгдандиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: мумнандиʼ
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [муӈгаюдиʼ, муӈгюдиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [муӈгаюдиʼ, муӈгюдиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [муӈгаютиʼ, муӈгютиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: мунодиʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: мунодиʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: мунотиʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: [муӈгатиʼ, муӈгтиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [муӈгаˮнатиʼ, муӈгˮнатиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [муӈгататиʼ, муӈгтатиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: муноˮманатиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: мундиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: мундиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: мундиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: муӈгандиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [муӈганандиʼ, муӈгнандиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [муӈгадандиʼ, муӈгдандиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: мумнандиʼ
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [муӈгаюдиʼ, муӈгюдиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [муӈгаюдиʼ, муӈгюдиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [муӈгаютиʼ, муӈгютиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: мунодиʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: мунодиʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: мунотиʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: [муӈгатиʼ, муӈгтиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [муӈгаˮнатиʼ, муӈгˮнатиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [муӈгататиʼ, муӈгтатиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: муноˮманатиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: мумаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: мумаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: мунаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: [муӈганаˮ, муӈгнаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [муӈгананаˮ, муӈгнанаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [муӈгаданаˮ, муӈгданаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: мумнанаˮ
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [муӈгаюнаˮ, муӈгюнаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [муӈгаюнаˮ, муӈгюнаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [муӈгаюнаˮ, муӈгюнаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: мунонаˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: мунонаˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: муноˮнаˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [муӈгаˮнаˮ, муӈгˮнаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [муӈгаˮнанаˮ, муӈгˮнанаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [муӈгатанаˮ, муӈгтанаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: муноˮмананаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: мулаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мундаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мундаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: муӈгандаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [муӈганандаˮ, муӈгнандаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [муӈгадандаˮ, муӈгдандаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: мумнандаˮ
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [муӈгаюдаˮ, муӈгюдаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [муӈгаюдаˮ, муӈгюдаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [муӈгаютаˮ, муӈгютаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: мунодаˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: мунодаˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: мунотаˮ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [муӈгатаˮ, муӈгтаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [муӈгаˮнатаˮ, муӈгˮнатаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [муӈгататаˮ, муӈгтатаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: муноˮманатаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: мундоʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мундоʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: мундоʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: муӈгандоʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [муӈганандоʼ, муӈгнандоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [муӈгадандоʼ, муӈгдандоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: мумнандоʼ
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [муӈгаюдоʼ, муӈгюдоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [муӈгаюдоʼ, муӈгюдоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [муӈгаютоʼ, муӈгютоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: мунодоʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: мунодоʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: мунотоʼ
     муʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [муӈгатоʼ, муӈгтоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [муӈгаˮнатоʼ, муӈгˮнатоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [муӈгататоʼ, муӈгтатоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: муноˮманатоʼ
     муʼ+N+Pred+Abs: мунд
     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [мундав, мундув, мундами, мундми]
#     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [мундами, мундми]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [мундав, мундув, мундами, мундми]
#     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [мундами, мундми]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [мундан, мундани, мундни]
#     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [мундани, мундни]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: мундар
     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: мундамд
     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: мунданд
     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [мундада, мундда]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [мундамда, мундмда]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [мунданда, мунднда]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [мундамиʼ, мундмиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [мундамиʼ, мундмиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [мунданиʼ, мундниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: мундриʼ
     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [мундамдиʼ, мундмдиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [мундандиʼ, мундндиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [мундадиʼ, мунддиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [мундамдиʼ, мундмдиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [мундандиʼ, мундндиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: мундваˮ
     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: мундваˮ
     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [мунданаˮ, мунднаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: мундраˮ
     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [мундамдаˮ, мундмдаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [мундандаˮ, мундндаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [мундадоʼ, мунддоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [мундамдоʼ, мундмдоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [мундандоʼ, мундндоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мундмʼ
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: мунд
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: муʼ
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: муниʼ
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мундиʼ
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: муӈгʼ
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: мумаˮ
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мундаˮ
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мунˮ
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: мундамзь
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: мундась
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мунзь
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: мунинзь
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: мундинзь
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: муӈганзь
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: мумаць
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: мундаць
     муʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мунаць
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мум
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мул
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мунда
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мумиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мулиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мундиʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мумаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мулаˮ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мундоʼ
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мумась
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мулась
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мундась
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: муминзь
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мулинзь
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мундинзь
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мумаць
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мулаць
     муʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мундонзь
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [муӈгаюн, муӈгюн]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [муӈгаюд, муӈгюд]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [муӈгаюда, муӈгюда]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [муӈгаюниʼ, муӈгюниʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдиʼ, муӈгюдиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдиʼ, муӈгюдиʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [муӈгаюнаˮ, муӈгюнаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдаˮ, муӈгюдаˮ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдоʼ, муӈгюдоʼ]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [муӈгаюнась, муӈгюнась]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдась, муӈгюдась]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдась, муӈгюдась]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [муӈгаюнинзь, муӈгюнинзь]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдинзь, муӈгюдинзь]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [муӈгаюдинзь, муӈгюдинзь]
     муʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [муӈгаюнаць, муӈгюнаць]
